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DTC C1551 / 51 IG Power Source Voltage Malfunction

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
The VGRS ECUmonitors IG power supply voltage. If the ECU detects a malfunction, it turns on the warning
light, records the DTC, and stops VGRS operation.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

C1551/51
The system checks that the battery voltage is normal and the
IG terminal voltage is less than 9 V for 6 sec.
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Check voltage between terminals IG and GND of the VGRS ECU connector.

PREPARATION:
Record and clear VGRS DTCs.
CHECK:
Start the engine andmeasure the voltage between terminals IG
and GND of the VGRS ECU.

A 9 to 16 V

B Below 9 V

C Above 16 V

B Check or repair harness and ECU−IG1 fuse.

C Check and repair charging system.

A

2 Check VGRS for DTC C1551/51.

Is DTC C1551/51 present?

YES Replace VGRS ECU.

NG

No fault detected.

NOTICE:
Fault may be intermittent. Check harness and connectors carefully and retest.


